Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 1. The Insurance Contract.
Sec. 21.42.280.
Payment discharges insurer.

When the proceeds of or payments under a life or health insurance policy or annuity contract, whether issued before or after July 1, 1966, become payable in accordance with the terms of the policy or contract, or the exercise of a right or privilege under the policy or contract and the insurer makes payment in accordance with the terms of the policy or contract or in accordance with a written assignment, the person then designated under the policy as being entitled to the proceeds or payments shall be entitled to receive the proceeds or payments and to give full acquittance for them. The payments shall fully discharge the insurer from all claims under the policy or contract unless, before payment is made, the insurer has received at its home office written notice by or on behalf of another person that the other person claims to be entitled to the payment or some interest in the policy or contract.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 43 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Sec. 21.42.290.
Minor may give acquittance.

A minor domiciled in this state who has attained the age of 16 years shall be considered competent to receive and to give full acquittance and discharge for a payment or payments in aggregate amount not exceeding $3,000 in any one year made by a life insurer under the maturity, death, or settlement agreement provisions in effect or elected by the minor under a life insurance policy or annuity contract, if the policy, contract, or agreement provides for the payment or payments to the minor, and if before the payment the insurer has not received written notice of the appointment of a duly qualified guardian of the property of the minor. A minor is not competent to alienate to the right to or to anticipate the payments.

This section does not require an insurer to determine whether another insurer is effecting a similar payment to the same minor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 15 ch 21 SLA 1985)

Sec. 21.42.300.
Forms for proof of loss to be furnished.

An insurer shall furnish, upon written request of the person claiming to have a loss under an insurance contract issued by the insurer, forms of proof of loss for completion by the person, but the insurer is not, by reason of the requirement to furnish forms, responsible for or with reference to the completion of the proof or the manner of the completion or attempted completion.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.310.
Claims administration not waiver.

Without limitation of a right or defense of an insurer otherwise, none of the following acts by or on behalf of an insurer constitute a waiver of a provision of a policy or of a defense of the insurer thereunder:

acknowledgment of the receipt of notice of loss or claim under the policy;

furnishing forms for reporting a loss or claim, for giving information relative to it, or for making proof of loss, or receiving or acknowledging receipt of forms or proofs completed or uncompleted;

investigating a loss or claim under a policy or engaging in negotiations for a possible settlement of the loss or claim.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.42.315.
Separate accounts.

A domestic life insurance company may establish one or more separate accounts, and may allocate to an account amounts, including proceeds applied under optional methods of settlement or under divided options, to provide for life insurance or annuities and benefits incidental to the account, payable in fixed or variable amounts or both.

The income, gains, and losses, realized or unrealized, from assets allocated to a separate account shall be credited to or charged against the account, without regard to other income, gains, or losses of the company.

Except as may be provided for reserves for guaranteed benefits and funds referred to in (d) of this section, amounts allocated to a separate account and accumulations to it may be invested and reinvested in securities eligible for investment for life insurance companies without regard to quantitative investment limitations prescribed by law for life insurance companies. The investments from separate accounts may not be considered in applying the investment limitations otherwise applicable to the investments of the company.

Reserves for benefits guaranteed as to dollar amount and duration and for funds guaranteed as to principal amount or stated rate of interest may not be maintained in a separate account, unless approved by the director and in accordance with conditions as to investments and other matters prescribed by the director. In imposing conditions, the director shall take into consideration the guaranteed nature of the benefits provided.

Unless otherwise approved by the director,

assets allocated to a separate account shall be valued at their market value on the date of valuation, or if there is no readily available market, then as provided under the terms of the contract or the rules or other written agreement applicable to a separate account; and

the portion of the assets of a separate account equal to the company’s reserve liability for the guaranteed benefits and funds referred to in (d) of this section shall be valued under the rules applicable to the valuation of the company’s other assets.

Amounts allocated to a separate account as provided in this section shall be owned by the company, and the company may not be, nor hold itself out to be, a trustee for those amounts. If the applicable contracts so provide, that portion of the assets of a separate account equal to the reserves and other contract liabilities of that account may not be chargeable with liabilities arising out of any other business the company may conduct.

A sale, exchange, or other transfer of assets may not be made by a company among its separate accounts or between other investment accounts and one or more of its separate accounts, unless, in the case of a transfer into a separate account, the transfer is made solely to establish the account or to support the operation of the contracts of the separate account to which the transfer is made, and unless the transfer, whether into or from a separate account, is made (1) by a transfer of cash, or (2) by a transfer of securities having a readily determinable market value, unless the transfer of securities is approved by the director. The director may approve other transfers among these accounts if the transfers would be equitable.

To the extent the company considers it necessary in order to comply with applicable federal or state laws, the company may give persons having an interest in a separate account, including a separate account that is a management investment company or a unit investment trust, appropriate voting and other rights and may adopt special procedures for the conduct of the business of the account which include special rights and procedures relating to investment policy, investment advisory services, selection of independent public accountants, and the selection of a committee, the members of which need not be otherwise affiliated with the company, to manage the business of the account.

A contract providing benefits payable in variable amounts delivered or issued for delivery in this state must contain a statement of the essential features of the procedures to be followed by the insurance company in determining the dollar amount of the variable benefits. A contract under which the benefits vary to reflect investment experience, including a group contract and certificate in evidence of variable benefits issued under it, must state that the dollar benefit amount will vary and must contain on its first page a statement that the benefits under it are on a variable basis.

A company may not deliver or issue for delivery in this state variable contracts unless it is licensed or organized to undertake a life insurance or annuity business in this state. The director may review the company’s financial condition or method of operation for the issuance of contracts payable in variable amounts to determine whether the company’s operation is hazardous to the public or its policyholders in this state. During the review the director shall consider (1) the history and financial condition of the company; (2) the character, responsibility, and fitness of the officers and directors of the company; and (3) the laws and regulations under which the company is authorized in the state of domicile to issue variable contracts. If the company is a subsidiary of an admitted life insurance company, or affiliated with an admitted company through common management or ownership, the director may consider that the company meets the provisions of this subsection if either it or the parent or the affiliated company meets the requirements of this subsection. If the company fails to meet the requirements contained in this subsection, the director may suspend the certificate of authority of the company until the requirements are met or may prohibit the further issuance of variable contracts.

The director has sole authority to regulate the issuance and sale of variable contracts, to examine and license agents to sell variable contracts, and to adopt regulations considered appropriate to carry out the purposes and provisions of this section.

Except for AS

21.45.030

,

21.45.080

,

21.45.110

,

21.45.180

,

21.45.230

,

21.45.240

,

21.45.290

,

21.45.300

, and AS

21.48.110

, and except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of this title apply to separate accounts and contracts relating to them. An individual variable life insurance contract delivered or issued for delivery in the state must contain grace reinstatement and nonforfeiture provisions appropriate to that contract. An individual variable annuity contract delivered or issued for delivery in the state must contain grace and reinstatement provisions appropriate for that contract. A group variable life insurance contract delivered or issued for delivery in the state must contain a grace provision appropriate for that contract. The reserve liability for variable contracts shall be established in accordance with actuarial procedures, acceptable to the director, that recognize the variable nature of the benefits provided and any mortality guarantees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 180 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.42.370

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Administrative Code. —

For variable contracts, see 3 AAC 28, art. 1.

Secs. 21.42.320 — 21.42.340.
Exemption of life insurance, group life insurance, and disability insurance proceeds.
[Repealed, § 14 ch 62 SLA 1982.
For current law see AS 09.38.025(a), 09.38.030(e), and 09.38.050.]